California statutes. Insurance Code
 of a lump-sum payment to the beneficiary or by another settlement option that is clearly described in the claim form. If the beneficiary is provided settlement options in addition to a lump-sum payment or a settlement option selected by the policyholder, the beneficiary shall have the option to choose how benefits are to be paid to the beneficiary. If the beneficiary does not choose one of the available settlement options, a retained-asset account may be the default option only if the claim form provides a prominent disclosure that, in the absence of a choice by the beneficiary, payment of policy benefits shall be made through establishment of a retained-asset account on the beneficiary’s behalf. This disclosure shall be provided in the portion of the claim form where the beneficiary is offered the ability to select his or her choice
 of payment method and shall be in easy-to-understand language and in bold and at least 12-point font type. In all such cases, whether by beneficiary choice or default, the insurer shall provide to the beneficiary the disclosure provided for in Section 10509.937.

(1) If an insurer offers an option or recommends the option to a policyholder of an individual or group life insurance policy that the beneficiary receive life insurance proceeds in the form of a retained-asset account or any arrangement other than a lump-sum payment, the insurer shall provide the policyholder, at the time the offer or recommendation is made, written information describing each of the settlement options available under the policy and specific details relevant to those options. If an insurer offers or recommends to a beneficiary that the beneficiary receive life insurance proceeds in the form of a retained-asset account or any arrangement other than a lump-sum payment in
 advance of the time the claim is made, the insurer shall provide the beneficiary written information describing each of the settlement options available under the policy and specific details relevant to those options. If an insurer offers or recommends to a beneficiary that the beneficiary receive life insurance proceeds in the form of a retained-asset account at the time a claim is being made, the insurer shall comply with the procedures set forth in Article 11 (commencing with Section 10509.930) of Chapter 5.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Lump-sum payment” means a single payment made directly to the beneficiary that satisfies all of the benefits owed to the beneficiary.

(B) “Retained-asset account” means any mechanism whereby the settlement of proceeds
 payable under a life insurance policy is accomplished by the insurer, or an entity acting on behalf of the insurer, by depositing those proceeds into an account with check or draft writing privileges, and where those proceeds are retained by the insurer pursuant to a supplemental contract not involving annuity benefits.

(g) An insurer that fails to conform to the requirements provided under this section shall be subject to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(h) The commissioner may, from time to time and after notice and public hearing, adopt regulations specifying reasonable requirements for the form of agreements entered into and written disclosures provided pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f), and for compliance with Section 10172.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 423, Sec. 1.   (SB 599)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10171.

Any life policy or other agreement relating to the holding or payment of the proceeds of a life policy may provide that the proceeds thereof or payments thereunder shall not be subject to transfer, anticipation or commutation or encumbrance by any beneficiary, and shall not be subject to the claims of creditors of any beneficiary or any legal process against any beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

10172.

Notwithstanding Sections 751 and 1100 of the Family Code and Section 249.5 of the Probate Code, when the proceeds of, or payments under, a life insurance policy become payable and the insurer makes payment thereof in accordance with the terms of the policy, or in accordance with the terms of any written assignment thereof if the policy has been assigned, that payment shall fully discharge the insurer from all claims under the policy unless, before that payment is made, the insurer has received, at its home office, written notice by or on behalf of some other person that the other person claims to be entitled to that payment or some interest in the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 775, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10172.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each insurer admitted to transact life insurance, credit life insurance, or accidental death insurance in this state that fails or refuses to pay the proceeds of, or payments under, any policy of life insurance issued by it within 30 days after the date of death of the insured shall pay interest, at a rate not less than the then current rate of interest on death proceeds left on deposit with the insurer computed from the date of the insured’s death, on any moneys payable and unpaid after the expiration of the 30-day period. This section shall apply only to deaths of insureds which occur on or after January 1, 1976.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow any insurer admitted to transact life insurance, credit life insurance, or accidental death insurance in this state to withhold payment of money payable under a life insurance policy to any beneficiary for a period longer than reasonably necessary to transmit that payment. Whenever possible payment shall be made within 30 days after the date of death of the insured.

(c) In any case in which interest on the proceeds of, or payments under, any policy of life insurance, credit life insurance, or accidental death insurance becomes payable pursuant to subdivision (a), the insurer shall notify the named beneficiary or beneficiaries at their last known address that interest will be paid on the proceeds of, or payments under, that policy from the date of death of the named insured. That notice shall specify the rate of interest to be paid. In any case where the notice required by Section 249.5 of the Probate Code has been given to a life insurer, that insurer is not required to provide the notice required by this section until after it has been notified that a child has actually been born within two years of the death of the decedent. The obligation shall be deemed satisfied by giving notice to the person who first provides proof to the insurer that the child has been born alive.

(d) This section shall not require the payment of interest in any case in which the beneficiary elects in writing delivered to the insurer to receive the proceeds of, or payments under, the policy by any means other than a lump-sum payment thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 775, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10173.

When a policy of life insurance is assigned in writing the insurer may deal with the assignee in any manner not inconsistent with the terms of said assignment until the insurer has received at its home office written notice by or on behalf of some other person that such other person claims to be entitled to some interest in such policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

10173.2.

When a policy of life insurance is, after the effective date of this section, assigned in writing as security for an indebtedness, the insurer shall, in any case in which it has received written notice of the name and address of the assignee, mail to the assignee a written notice, postage prepaid and addressed to the assignee’s address filed with the insurer, not less than 30 days prior to the final lapse of the policy, each time the policy owner has failed or refused to transmit a premium payment to the insurer before the commencement of the policy’s grace period or before the notice is mailed. The insurer shall give that notice to the assignee in the proper case while the assignment remains in effect, unless the assignee has notified the insurer in writing that the
 notice is waived. The insurer shall be permitted to charge the policy owner directly or against the policy the reasonable cost of complying with this section, but in no event to exceed two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) for each notice.

As used in this section, “final lapse of the policy” means the date after which the policy will not be reinstated by the insurer without requiring evidence of insurability or written application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 315, Sec. 3.   (AB 1747)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10174.

Policies of disability insurance, as defined in Section 106, that provide for death benefits, shall, as to those death benefits, be subject to Sections 10172, 10172.5, and 10173.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 601, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10175.

Nothing contained in Sections 10172, 10173 or 10174 shall affect any claim or right to any policy or the proceeds thereof, or payments thereunder, as between all persons other than the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

10175.5.

(a) No disability insurance contract with a physician and surgeon, physician and surgeon group, or other licensed health care practitioner shall contain any incentive plan that includes specific payment made in any type or form, to a physician and surgeon, physician and surgeon group, or other licensed health care practitioner as an inducement to deny, reduce, limit, or delay specific, medically necessary, and appropriate services provided with respect to specific insureds or groups of insureds with similar medical conditions.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit payment arrangements that are not tied to specific medical decisions involving specific insureds or group of insureds with similar medical conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1014, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.

(a) In disability insurance, the policy may provide for payment of medical, surgical, chiropractic, physical therapy, speech pathology, audiology, acupuncture, professional mental health, dental, hospital, or optometric expenses upon a reimbursement basis, or for the exclusion of any of those services, and provision may be made therein for payment of all or a portion of the amount of charge for these services without requiring that the insured first pay the expenses. The policy shall not prohibit the insured from selecting any psychologist or other person who is the holder of a certificate or license under Section 1000, 1634, 2050, 2472, 2553, 2630, 2948, 3055, or 4938 of the Business and Professions Code, to perform the particular services
 covered under the terms of the policy, the certificate holder or licensee being expressly authorized by law to perform those services.

(b) If the insured selects any person who is a holder of a certificate under Section 4938 of the Business and Professions Code, a disability insurer or nonprofit hospital service plan shall pay the bona fide claim of an acupuncturist holding a certificate pursuant to Section 4938 of the Business and Professions Code for the treatment of an insured person only if the insured’s policy or contract expressly includes acupuncture as a benefit and includes coverage for the injury or illness treated. Unless the policy or contract expressly includes acupuncture as a benefit, no person who is the holder of any license or certificate set forth in this section shall be paid or reimbursed under the policy for acupuncture.

(c) The policy shall not prohibit the
 insured, upon referral by a physician and surgeon licensed under Section 2050 of the Business and Professions Code, from selecting any licensed clinical social worker who is the holder of a license issued under Section 4996 of the Business and Professions Code, any occupational therapist as specified in Section 2570.2 of the Business and Professions Code, any marriage and family therapist who is the holder of a license under Section 4980.50 of the Business and Professions Code, or any professional clinical counselor who is the holder of a license under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, to perform the particular services covered under the terms of the policy, or from selecting any speech-language pathologist or audiologist licensed under Section 2532 of the Business and Professions Code or any registered nurse licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code who possesses a master’s
 degree in psychiatric-mental health nursing and is listed as a psychiatric-mental health nurse by the Board of Registered Nursing, or any advanced practice registered nurse certified as a clinical nurse specialist pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 2838) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code who participates in expert clinical practice in the specialty of psychiatric-mental health nursing, or any respiratory care practitioner certified pursuant to Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code to perform services deemed necessary by the referring physician and surgeon, that certificate holder, licensee or otherwise regulated person, being expressly authorized by law to perform the services.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow any certificate holder or licensee enumerated in this section to perform professional mental health services beyond
 his or her field or fields of competence as established by his or her education, training, and experience.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Marriage and family therapist” means a licensed marriage and family therapist who has received specific instruction in assessment, diagnosis, prognosis, and counseling, and psychotherapeutic treatment of premarital, marriage, family, and child relationship dysfunctions, which is equivalent to the instruction required for licensure on January 1, 1981.

 (2) “Professional clinical counselor” means a licensed professional clinical counselor who has received specific instruction in assessment, diagnosis, prognosis, counseling, and psychotherapeutic treatment of mental and emotional disorders, which is equivalent to the instruction required for licensure on January 1,
 2012.

(f) An individual disability insurance policy, which is issued, renewed, or amended on or after January 1, 1988, which includes mental health services coverage may not include a lifetime waiver for that coverage with respect to any applicant. The lifetime waiver of coverage provision shall be deemed unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 37.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.1.

As of the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted at the 1969 Regular Session of the Legislature all disability policies shall be construed to be in compliance with Section 10176, and any provision in such policies in conflict therewith shall be of no effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 296.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.2.

As an alternative to the exclusion permitted by Section 10176, a disability insurance policy may provide that services of a licensed physical therapist, licensed pursuant to Section 2630 of the Business and Professions Code, will be paid only if rendered pursuant to a method of treatment prescribed by a person holding a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate issued by the Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 886, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.25.

(a) As an alternative to an exclusion permitted by Section 10176, a disability insurance policy may provide that services of a registered dietitian or other nutrition professional meeting the qualifications prescribed by subdivision (a) or (e) of Section 2585 of the Business and Professions Code will be paid only if rendered pursuant to a method of treatment prescribed by a person holding a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate issued by the Medical Board of California.

(b) Nothing in this section requires disability insurers to automatically pay for services provided by a registered dietitian or other nutrition professional.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 628, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.3.

The amendments to Section 10176 and the addition of Section 10176.2 enacted at the 1971 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be applicable only to those policies issued or amended on or after the effective date of such amendments and addition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1490.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.4.

For purposes of establishing the fact of disability in credit disability insurance, disability insurance or life insurance, chiropractors’ certifications of disability when made within the scope of their license shall be accepted by insurers as equally valid as physicians and surgeons’ certifications of disability when made within the scope of their license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 651.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.5.

Disability insurance which is written or issued for delivery outside California in a state the laws of which require recognition of psychologists licensed in such state for services performed within the scope of psychological practice shall not be deemed to prohibit the insured from selecting a psychologist licensed in California to perform services in California which are covered under the terms of the policy even though such psychologist is not licensed in the state in which the insurance is written or issued for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.6.

On and after January 1, 1982, every policy of disability insurance which is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses on a group basis shall offer coverage for diabetic daycare self-management education programs, under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the insurer and the group policyholder, subject to utilization controls.

Coverage shall only apply to programs directed and supervised by a licensed physician who is board certified in internal medicine or pediatrics. Diabetic daycare self-management and education programs shall be provided by health care professionals including, but not limited to, physicians, registered nurses, registered pharmacists, and registered dieticians who are knowledgeable about the disease process of diabetes and the treatment of diabetic patients.

As used in this section, diabetic daycare self-management education programs means instruction which will enable diabetic patients and their families to gain an understanding of the diabetic disease process, and the daily management of diabetic therapy thereby avoiding frequent hospitalizations and complications.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the offering of programs whose sole or primary purpose is weight reduction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 750, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.61.

(a) An insurer issuing, amending, delivering, or renewing a disability insurance policy on or after January 1, 2000, that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall include coverage for the following equipment and supplies for the management and treatment of insulin-using diabetes, non-insulin-using diabetes, and gestational diabetes as medically necessary, even if the items are available without a prescription:

(1) Blood glucose monitors and blood glucose testing strips.

(2) Blood glucose monitors designed to assist the visually impaired.

(3) Insulin pumps and all related necessary supplies.

(4) Ketone urine testing strips.

(5) Lancets and lancet puncture devices.

(6) Pen delivery systems for the administration of insulin.

(7) Podiatric devices to prevent or treat diabetes-related complications.

(8) Insulin syringes.

(9) Visual aids, excluding eyewear, to assist the visually impaired with proper dosing of insulin.

(b) An insurer issuing, amending,
 delivering, or renewing a disability insurance policy on or after January 1, 2000, that covers prescription benefits shall include coverage for the following prescription items if the items are determined to be medically necessary:

(1) Insulin.

(2) Prescriptive medications for the treatment of diabetes.

(3) Glucagon.

(c) The coinsurances and deductibles for the benefits specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not exceed those established for similar benefits within the given policy.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a large group health insurance policy that is issued,
 amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, shall not impose a copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other cost sharing on an insulin prescription drug that exceeds thirty-five dollars ($35) for a 30-day supply. At least one insulin for a given drug type in all forms and concentrations shall be on the prescription drug formulary.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), an individual or small group health insurance policy that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall not impose a copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other cost sharing on an insulin prescription drug that exceeds thirty-five dollars ($35) for a 30-day supply. If an individual or small group health insurance policy maintains a drug formulary grouped into tiers, the cost-sharing cap pursuant to paragraph (1) shall apply only to insulin prescription
 drugs that are in Tier 1 and Tier 2. At least one insulin for a given drug type in all forms and concentrations shall be on Tier 1 or Tier 2. If there is no Tier 1 or Tier 2 insulin prescription drug that is clinically appropriate for an insured, the health insurer shall limit the cost sharing for a higher tier drug to no more than thirty-five dollars ($35) for a 30-day supply for an individual insured.

(3) If a health insurance policy is a high deductible health plan, as defined in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the policy shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, or any other cost sharing on an
 insulin prescription drug that exceeds thirty-five dollars ($35) for a 30-day supply, unless applying the thirty-five-dollar ($35) limitation for a 30-day supply of an insulin prescription drug would conflict with federal requirements for high deductible health plans.

(4) When the state has the capacity to label or produce an insulin prescription drug, the deductible and copayment limitations in paragraph (1) shall also apply to an insulin prescription drug, or any therapeutic equivalent insulin prescription drug, that is labeled or produced by the state.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision and subdivision (e):

(A) “Drug type” includes, but is not limited to, rapid acting,
 regular or short acting, intermediate acting, long acting, ultra-long acting, and premixed.

 (B) “Insulin prescription drug” means a prescription drug that contains insulin and is used to control blood glucose levels to treat diabetes.

(e) (1) Consistent with this section, on and after January 1, 2026, a health insurer shall not impose step therapy as a prerequisite to authorizing coverage of an insulin prescription drug described in subdivision (d), except as provided in paragraph (2). For purposes of this section, “step therapy” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 10123.201. For purposes of this section, step therapy is prohibited for both self-administered drugs and physician-administered drugs, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) Because the United States Food and
 Drug Administration has approved one or more types of insulin, this section does not require a health care service plan to cover all of the types of insulin without step therapy, if at least one insulin in each drug type is covered without step therapy.

(f) An insurer shall provide coverage for diabetes outpatient self-management training, education, and medical nutrition therapy necessary to enable an insured to properly use the equipment, supplies, and medications set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) and additional diabetes outpatient self-management training, education, and medical nutrition therapy upon the direction or prescription of those services by the insured’s participating physician. If an insurer delegates outpatient self-management training to contracting providers, the insurer shall require contracting providers to ensure
 that diabetes outpatient self-management training, education, and
 medical nutrition therapy are provided by appropriately licensed or registered health care professionals.

(g) The diabetes outpatient self-management training, education, and medical nutrition therapy services identified in subdivision (f) shall be provided by appropriately licensed or registered health care professionals as prescribed by a health care professional legally authorized to prescribe the services.

(h) The coinsurances and deductibles for the benefits specified in subdivision (f) shall not exceed those established for physician office visits by the insurer.

(i) Every disability insurer governed by this section shall disclose the benefits covered pursuant to this section in the insurer’s evidence of
 coverage and disclosure forms.

(j) An insurer shall not reduce or eliminate coverage as a result of this section.

(k) This section does not apply to vision-only, dental-only, accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance, except that for accident-only, specified disease, and hospital indemnity insurance coverage, benefits under this section only apply to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy. This section does not impose a new benefit mandate on accident-only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 737, Sec. 3.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.7.

(a) Disability insurance where the insurer is licensed to do business in this state and which provides coverage under a contract of insurance which includes California residents but which may be written or issued for delivery outside of California where benefits are provided within the scope of practice of a licensed clinical social worker, a registered nurse licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code who possesses a master’s degree in psychiatric-mental health nursing and two years of supervised experience in psychiatric-mental health nursing, a marriage and family therapist who is the holder of a license under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980) of Division 2 of the
 Business and Professions Code, a professional clinical counselor who is the holder of a license under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a respiratory care practitioner certified pursuant to Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code shall not be deemed to prohibit persons covered under the contract from selecting those licensees in California to perform the services in California that are within the terms of the contract even though the licensees are not licensed in the state where the contract is written or issued for delivery.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in amending this section in the 1984 portion of the 1983–84 Legislative Session that persons covered by the insurance and those providers of health care specified in this section who are licensed in California should be entitled to the benefits provided by the
 insurance for services of those providers rendered to those persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 38.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.8.

A disability insurance policy may provide that services of a respiratory care practitioner certified pursuant to Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700) of the Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, will be paid for pulmonary rehabilitation and respiratory home care only if rendered pursuant to a method of treatment prescribed by a physician and surgeon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 786, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.9.

No policy, contract, or agreement coming within the provisions of this article, issued, entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 1984, shall be deemed to contain any provision restricting the liability of the insurer or plan with respect to expenses solely because the expenses were incurred while the person insured was in a state hospital, if the policy, contract, or agreement would have paid for the services but for the fact that they were provided in a state hospital. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require an insurer or plan to pay a state hospital for covered expenses incurred by an insured or covered individual at a rate or charge higher than the insurer or plan would pay for such services to a hospital with which the insurer or plan has entered a contract providing for alternative rates of payment or limiting payments for services secured by insureds or covered individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.   Effective September 14, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.10.

(a) On or after January 1, 1994, no disability insurer issuing policies covering hospital, surgical, or medical expenses delivered or renewed in this state or certificates of group disability insurance delivered or renewed in this state pursuant to a master group policy delivered or renewed in another state, to individuals, or to employer groups with fewer than two eligible employees, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 10700, shall close a block of business without complying with this section.

(b) As used in this section, “block of business” means individual, group, or blanket disability insurance contracts covering hospital, medical, or surgical expenses of a particular policy form that has distinct benefits or marketing methods. “Closed block of business” means a block of business for which an insurer ceases to actively market and sell new contracts under a particular policy form in this state.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a block of business shall be presumed closed if either of the following applies:

(1) There has been an overall reduction of 12 percent in the number of in force policies of a particular form for a period of 12 months.

(2) The block has less than 2,000 insured nationally or 1,000 insureds in California. This presumption shall not apply to a block of business initiated within the previous 24 months, but notification of that block shall be provided to the commissioner. The notification shall not be subject to the approval required by subdivision (d).

An insurer may present evidence for consideration by the commissioner that the presumption in the particular case is incorrect. Should the determination be made that the block is closed, the insurer shall be given those remedy options contained in subdivision (d). The fact that a block of business does not meet one of the presumptions set forth in this subdivision shall not preclude a determination that it is closed as defined in subdivision (b).

(d) An insurer shall notify the commissioner within 30 days of its decision to close a block or, in the absence of an actual decision to close a block of business, within 30 days of its determination that the block is within the presumptions set forth in subdivision (c). The commissioner may notify an insurer that he or she has determined that the presumptions contained in subdivision (c) apply to a block. No insurer providing disability insurance covering hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall close a policy form or group certificate without notification to the commissioner. That notification shall include a plan to permit an insured to move to any open block, providing comparable benefits with no additional underwriting requirement or, alternatively, the insurer shall be required to pool the closed block’s experience with all appropriate open forms for purposes of renewal rate determination, with no rate penalty or surcharge, beyond that which reflects the experience of the combined pool. When the insurer chooses to pool, the notice shall include the insurer’s plan for pooling the closed block’s experience. The insurer may implement the pooling plan if 30 days expire after the submission is filed without written notice from the commissioner specifying the reasons for his or her opinion that the pooling plan does not comply with the requirements of this section, or, prior to that time, if the commissioner provides the insurer written notice that the pooling plan complies with the requirements of this section.

The approval shall be based upon consideration of the accumulative recent and expected future experience of the closed form and those with which the closed form is to be combined.

(e) No insurer shall offer or sell any form nor provide misleading information about the active or closed status of its business for the purpose of evading this section.

(f) An insurer shall bring any blocks of business closed prior to the effective date of this section into compliance with the terms of this section no later than December 31, 1994.

(g) This section shall not apply to small employer carriers providing small employer health insurance to individuals or employer groups with fewer than two eligible employees if that coverage is provided pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 10700) of Part 2 of Division 2, and with specific reference to coverage for individuals or employer groups with fewer than two eligible employees, is approved by the commissioner pursuant to Section 10705, provided a carrier electing to sell coverage pursuant to this subdivision shall continue to do so until such time as the carrier ceases to market coverage to small employers and complies with subdivision (c) of Section 10713.

(h) This section shall not apply to accident only coverage, coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government, Medicare supplement coverage, long-term care insurance, dental, vision, or conversion coverage, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, or automobile medical payment insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 336, Sec. 27.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10176.11.

(a) An insurer that provides a policy of health insurance shall accept premium payments from the following third-party entities without the need to comply with subdivision (c):

(1) A Ryan White HIV/AIDS Program under Title XXVI of the federal Public Health Service Act.

(2) An Indian tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization.

(3) A local, state, or federal government program, including a grantee directed by a government program to make payments on its behalf.

(4) A member of the individual’s family, defined for purposes of this section to include the
 individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, parent, grandparent, and siblings, unless the true source of funds used to make the premium payment originates with a financially interested entity.

(b) A financially interested entity that is not specified in subdivision (a) and is making third-party premium payments shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) It shall provide assistance for the full policy year and notify the insured prior to an open enrollment period, if applicable, if financial assistance will be discontinued. Notification shall include information regarding alternative coverage options, including, but not limited to, Medicare, Medicaid, individual market policies, and employer policies, if applicable. Assistance may be discontinued at the request of an insured who obtains other health insurance coverage, or if the insured dies during the policy
 year.

(2) It shall agree not to condition financial assistance on eligibility for, or receipt of, any surgery, transplant, procedure, drug, or device.

(3) It shall inform an applicant of financial assistance, and shall inform an insured annually, of all available health coverage options, including, but not limited to, Medicare, Medicaid, individual market plans, and employer plans, if applicable.

(4) It shall agree not to steer, direct, or advise the insured into or away from a specific coverage program option or health coverage.

(5) It shall agree that financial assistance shall not be conditioned on the use of a specific facility, health care provider, or coverage type.

(6) It shall
 agree that financial assistance shall be based on financial need in accordance with criteria that are uniformly applied and publicly available.

(c) A financially interested entity shall not make a third-party premium payment unless the entity complies with both of the following requirements:

(1) Annually provides a statement to the health insurer that it meets the requirements set forth in subdivision (b), as applicable.

(2) Discloses to the health insurer, prior to making the initial payment, the name of the insured for each policy on whose behalf a third-party premium payment described in this section will be made.

(d) (1) Reimbursement for insureds for whom a nonprofit financially interested entity described in paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (h) that was already making premium payments to a health insurer on the insured’s behalf prior to October 1, 2019, is not subject to subdivisions (e) and (f) and the financially interested entity is not required to comply with the disclosure requirements described in subdivision (c) for those insureds.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a financially interested entity shall comply with the disclosure requirements of subdivision (c) for an insured on whose behalf the financially interested entity was making premium payments to a health insurer on the insured’s behalf prior to October 1, 2019, if the insured changes health insurers on or after March 1, 2020.

(3) The amount of reimbursement for services paid to a financially interested provider shall be governed by the terms of the insured’s health insurance policy contract, except for an insured who has changed health
 insurers pursuant to paragraph (2), in which case, commencing January 1, 2022, the reimbursement amount shall be determined in accordance with subdivisions (e) and (f).

(e) Commencing January 1, 2022, if a financially interested entity makes a third-party premium payment to a health insurer on behalf of an insured, reimbursement to a financially interested provider for covered services shall be determined by the following:
